Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-430
Railroad signals; interference with view; authority of commission.

It shall be unlawful to locate, maintain, or allow to remain any light at any place within this state in such a place or manner that the light interferes with the view of any railroad signal to an extent which causes danger in the operation of trains.

Whenever any light has been located, maintained, or allowed to remain in such a place or manner that it interferes with the view of any railroad signal to an extent which causes danger in the operation of trains, the commission shall, upon its own motion or upon the complaint of an affected owner of a railroad or other interested party, set the complaint for hearing and issue a formal order to enforce compliance with this section if it finds that the light does interfere to such an extent.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. IV, § 30, p. 1411;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 96.